Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2716
Custodian's expenses, compensation, and bond.

(1) A custodian is entitled to reimbursement from custodial property for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the custodian's duties.

(2) Except for one who is a transferor under section 43-2705, a custodian has a noncumulative election during each calendar year to charge reasonable compensation for services performed during that year.

(3) Except as provided in subsection (6) of section 43-2719, a custodian need not give a bond.

Laws 1992, LB 907, § 16.